Washington statutes.
RCW 10.40.090

Sustaining motion—Effect of.

An order to set aside the indictment or information as provided in this chapter shall be no bar to a future prosecution for the same offense.

[ 1891 c 28 s 54; Code 1881 s 1050; RRS s 2104.]